District of Columbia statutes.
22-4511

False information in purchase of weapons prohibited.

No person shall, in purchasing a pistol or in applying for a license to carry the same, or in purchasing a machine gun, sawed-off shotgun, or blackjack within the District of Columbia, give false information or offer false evidence of his or her identity.

July 8, 1932, 47 Stat. 653, ch. 465, § 11
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119,§ 15(j), 41 DCR 1639

History

1981 Ed., § 22-3211.
1973 Ed., § 22-3211.

Prior Codifications